New York, session 2025-2026, A11417.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public service law is amended by adding a new section 2 54 to read as follows: 3 § 54. Utility automatic savings program. 1. Within two years of the 4 effective date of this section, notwithstanding any other provision of 5 law, the commission is authorized and directed to require utility compa- 6 nies to enroll any customer over fifty-five years of age in any discount 7 or savings program provided by such utility. An enrolled customer's 8 monthly bill shall clearly and conspicuously state the programs such 9 customer is enrolled in and the savings from such programs. Enrollment 10 shall be available at any time during the year. Utilities shall provide 11 a mechanism for a customer to opt out of such programs. For the 12 purposes of this section, "utility company" shall mean a utility company 13 that provides electric, gas, or steam service. 14 2. A utility company which offers such a discount or savings program 15 shall conspicuously advertise the availability of such program on the 16 website of such utility company. 17 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 18 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14442-01-6